Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB573.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 121.015 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Registry" means the Kentucky Registry of Election Finance;
(2) "Election" means any primary, regular, or special election to fill vacancies
regardless of whether a candidate or slate of candidates is opposed or unopposed in
an election. Each primary, regular, or special election shall be considered a separate
election;
(3) "Committee" includes the following:
(a) "Campaign committee," which means one (1) or more persons who receive
contributions and make expenditures to support or oppose one (1) or more
specific candidates or slates of candidates for nomination or election to any
state, county, city, or district office, that is authorized by the candidate or slate
of candidates to receive contributions, make expenditures, and generally
conduct a campaign for the candidate or slate of candidates, but does not
include an entity established solely by a candidate which is managed solely by
a candidate and a campaign treasurer and whose name is generic in nature,
such as "Friends of (the candidate)," and does not reflect that other persons
have structured themselves as a committee, designated officers of the
committee, and assigned responsibilities and duties to each officer with the
purpose of managing a campaign to support or oppose a candidate in an
election;
(b) "Independent expenditure-only committee," which means one (1) or more
persons who receive unlimited contributions for the purpose of making only
independent expenditures to support or oppose one (1) or more specific
candidates or slates of candidates for nomination or election to any state,
Page 1 of 14
XXXX 2/5/2026 2:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2092
county, city, or district office;
(c) "Caucus campaign committee," which means members of one (1) of the
following caucus groups who receive contributions and make expenditures to
support or oppose one (1) or more specific candidates or slates of candidates
for nomination or election, or a committee:
1. House Democratic caucus campaign committee;
2. House Republican caucus campaign committee;
3. Senate Democratic caucus campaign committee;
4. Senate Republican caucus campaign committee; or
5. Subdivisions of the state executive committee of a minor political party,
which serve the same function as the above-named committees, as
determined by regulations promulgated by the registry;
(d) "Political issues committee," which means three (3) or more persons joining
together to advocate or oppose a ballot measure if that committee receives or
expends money in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000);
(e) "Permanent committee," which means a group of individuals, including an
association, committee, or organization, other than a campaign committee,
independent expenditure-only committee, federally registered political
committee, political issues committee, inaugural committee, caucus campaign
committee, or party executive committee, which is established as, or intended
to be, a permanent organization having as a primary purpose expressly
advocating the election or defeat of one (1) or more clearly identified
candidates, slates of candidates, or political parties, which functions on a
regular basis throughout the year;
(f) [An ]"Executive committee of a political party," which means a political
committee that is a subdivision of a national political party committee and
operates within the structure and under the supervision of the state
Page 2 of 14
XXXX 2/5/2026 2:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2092
executive committee of that same political party. Political parties may
support candidates for public office, raise and spend money for their
internal operations, and are governed by a committee that is elected by the
voters in that subdivision in a manner not inconsistent with the rules of that
same political party; and
(g) "Inaugural committee," which means one (1) or more persons who receive
contributions and make expenditures in support of inauguration activities for
any candidate or slate of candidates elected to any state, county, city, or
district office;
(4) "Contributing organization" means a group which merely contributes to candidates,
slates of candidates, campaign committees, caucus campaign committees, or
executive committees from time to time from funds derived solely from within the
group, and which does not solicit or receive funds from sources outside the group
itself. Any contributions made by the groups in excess of one hundred dollars
($100) shall be reported to the registry;
(5) "Testimonial affair" means an affair held in honor of a person who holds or who is
or was a candidate for nomination or election to a political office in this state
designed to raise funds for any purpose not charitable, religious, or educational;
(6) "Contribution" means any:
(a) Payment, distribution, loan, deposit, or gift of money or other thing of value,
to a candidate, his or her agent, a slate of candidates, its authorized agent, a
committee, or contributing organization. As used in this subsection, "loan"
shall include a guarantee, endorsement, or other form of security where the
risk of nonpayment rests with the surety, guarantor, or endorser, as well as
with a committee, contributing organization, candidate, slate of candidates, or
other primary obligor. No person shall become liable as surety, endorser, or
guarantor for any sum in any one (1) election which, when combined with all
Page 3 of 14
XXXX 2/5/2026 2:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2092
other contributions the individual makes to a candidate, his or her agent, a
slate of candidates, its agent, a committee, or a contributing organization,
exceeds the contribution limits provided in KRS 121.150;
(b) Payment by any person other than the candidate, his or her authorized
treasurer, a slate of candidates, its authorized treasurer, a committee, or a
contributing organization, of compensation for the personal services of
another person which are rendered to a candidate, slate of candidates,
committee, or contributing organization, or for inauguration activities;
(c) Goods, advertising, or services with a value of more than one hundred dollars
($100) in the aggregate in any one (1) election which are furnished to a
candidate, slate of candidates, committee, or contributing organization or for
inauguration activities without charge, or at a rate which is less than the rate
normally charged for the goods or services; or
(d) Payment by any person other than a candidate, his or her authorized treasurer,
a slate of candidates, its authorized treasurer, a committee, or contributing
organization for any goods or services with a value of more than one hundred
dollars ($100) in the aggregate in any one (1) election which are utilized by a
candidate, slate of candidates, committee, or contributing organization, or for
inauguration activities;
(7) Notwithstanding the foregoing meanings of "contribution," the word shall not be
construed to include:
(a) Services provided without compensation by individuals volunteering a portion
or all of their time on behalf of a candidate, a slate of candidates, committee,
or contributing organization;
(b) A loan of money by any financial institution doing business in Kentucky
made in accordance with applicable banking laws and regulations and in the
ordinary course of business; or
Page 4 of 14
XXXX 2/5/2026 2:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2092
(c) An independent expenditure by any individual or permanent committee;
(8) "Candidate" means any person who has received contributions or made
expenditures, has appointed a campaign treasurer, or has given his or her consent
for any other person to receive contributions or make expenditures with a view to
bringing about his or her nomination or election to a nonfederal public office,
except as provided in KRS 121.180(10)(b);
(9) "Slate of candidates" means:
(a) Between the time a certificate or petition of nomination has been filed for a
candidate for the office of Governor under KRS 118.365 and the time the
candidate designates a running mate for the office of Lieutenant Governor
under KRS 118.126, a slate of candidates consists of the candidate for the
office of Governor; and
(b) After that candidate has designated a running mate under KRS 118.126, that
same slate of candidates consists of that same candidate for the office of
Governor and the candidate's running mate for the office of Lieutenant
Governor. Unless the context requires otherwise, any provision of law that
applies to a candidate shall also apply to a slate of candidates;
(10) "Knowingly" means, with respect to conduct or to a circumstance described by a
statute defining an offense, that a person is aware or should have been aware that
his or her conduct is of that nature or that the circumstance exists;
(11) "Fundraiser" means an individual who directly solicits and secures contributions on
behalf of a candidate or slate of candidates for a statewide-elected state office or an
office in a jurisdiction with a population in excess of two hundred thousand
(200,000) residents;
(12) "Independent expenditure" means:
(a) The expenditure of money or other things of value for a communication which
expressly advocates the election or defeat of a clearly identified candidate or
Page 5 of 14
XXXX 2/5/2026 2:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2092
slate of candidates, and which:
1. Is made without any coordination, consultation, or cooperation with any
candidate, slate of candidates, campaign committee, or any authorized
person acting on behalf of any of them; and
2. Is not made in concert with, or at the request or suggestion of any
candidate, slate of candidates, campaign committee, or any authorized
person acting on behalf of any of them; or
(b) The expenditure of money or other things of value for a communication which
expressly advocates or opposes a ballot measure, and which:
1. Is made without any coordination, consultation, or cooperation with any
political issues committee, or any authorized person acting on behalf of
a political issues committee; and
2. Is not made in concert with, or at the request or suggestion of, any
political issues committee, or any authorized person acting on behalf of
a political issues committee;
(13) "Electronic reporting" means the use of technology, having electrical, digital,
magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities, by which an
individual or other entity submits, compiles, or transmits campaign finance reports
to the registry, or by which the registry receives, stores, analyzes, or discloses the
reports;
(14) "Security procedure" means a procedure employed for the purpose of verifying that
an electronic signature, record, or performance is that of a specific person or for
detecting changes or errors in the information in an electronic record. The term
includes a procedure that requires the use of algorithms or other codes, identifying
words or numbers, encryption, or callback or other acknowledgment procedures;
(15) "Electronic signature" means an electronic sound, symbol, or process attached to or
logically associated with a record and executed or adopted by a person with the
Page 6 of 14
XXXX 2/5/2026 2:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2092
intent to sign the record;
(16) "Filer" means any candidate, a slate of candidates, committee, or other individual or
entity required to submit financial disclosure reports to the registry;
(17) "Filer-side software" means software provided to or used by the filer that enables
transmittal of financial reports to the registry;
(18) "Form" means an online web page or an electronic document designed to capture,
validate, and submit data for processing to the registry, unless the context otherwise
prescribes;
(19) "Reasonable cause" means an event, happening, or circumstance entirely beyond
the knowledge or control of the candidate, slate of candidates, or committee, which
has exercised due care and prudence in maintaining the records of the campaign or
committee pursuant to statute or administrative regulation;
(20) "Foreign national" means:
(a) An individual who is not a citizen or lawful permanent resident of the United
States;
(b) A government, political subdivision, or municipality of a foreign country;
(c) A foreign political party;
(d) Any entity, including but not limited to a partnership, association, corporation,
organization, or other combination of persons, that is organized under the
laws of or has its principal place of business in a foreign country; or
(e) Any entity in the United States, including but not limited to a partnership,
association, corporation, or organization that is wholly or majority owned by
any foreign national, unless:
1. Any contribution or expenditure the entity makes derives entirely from
funds generated by the entity's United States operations; and
2. All decisions concerning the contribution or expenditure, except for
setting overall budget amounts, are made by individuals who are United
Page 7 of 14
XXXX 2/5/2026 2:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2092
States citizens or permanent residents;
(21) "Ballot measure" means a question, other than the nomination or election of a
candidate for public office, which has been:
(a) Approved by a political subdivision or the General Assembly and is required
by law to be placed before the voters of the territory affected; or
(b) Initiated or referred by citizen petition as authorized by KRS 242.020 and
placed before the voters of the territory affected;
(22) "Preliminary activity" includes but is not limited to:
(a) Participating in focus groups;
(b) Making telephone calls;
(c) Traveling;
(d) Conducting polls; and
(e) Drafting ballot measure language; and
(23) "Tax-exempt organization" means an organization described in 26 U.S.C. sec.
501(c) and exempt from federal taxation under 26 U.S.C. sec. 501(a). This
subsection shall not be construed to treat a political organization under 26 U.S.C.
sec. 527 as a tax-exempt organization for purposes of this chapter.
Section 2. KRS 121.150 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No contribution shall be made or received, directly or indirectly, other than an
independent expenditure, to support inauguration activities or to support or defeat a
candidate, slate of candidates, constitutional amendment, or public question which
will appear on the ballot in an election, except through the duly appointed campaign
manager, or campaign treasurer of the candidate, slate of candidates, or registered
committee. Any person making an independent expenditure, shall report these
expenditures when the expenditures by that person exceed five hundred dollars
($500) in the aggregate in any one (1) election, on a form provided or using a
format approved by the registry and shall sign a statement on the form, under
Page 8 of 14
XXXX 2/5/2026 2:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2092
penalty of perjury, that the expenditure was an actual independent expenditure and
that there was no prior communication with the campaign on whose behalf it was
made.
(2) Except as provided in KRS 121.180(10), the solicitation from and contributions by
campaign committees, independent expenditure-only committees, caucus campaign
committees, political issues committees, permanent committees, and party
executive committees to any religious, charitable, civic, eleemosynary, or other
causes or organizations established primarily for the public good is expressly
prohibited; except that it shall not be construed as a violation of this section for a
candidate or a slate of candidates to contribute to religious, civic, or charitable
groups.
(3) No candidate, slate of candidates, committee, or contributing organization, nor
anyone acting on their behalf, shall accept any anonymous contribution in excess of
one hundred dollars ($100), and all anonymous contributions in excess of one
hundred dollars ($100) shall be returned to the donor, if the donor can be
determined. If no donor is found, the contribution shall escheat to the state. No
candidate, slate of candidates, committee, or contributing organization, nor anyone
acting on their behalf shall accept anonymous contributions in excess of two
thousand dollars ($2,000) in the aggregate in any one (1) election. Anonymous
contributions in excess of two thousand dollars ($2,000) in the aggregate which are
received in any one (1) election shall escheat to the state.
(4) No candidate, slate of candidates, committee, or contributing organization, nor
anyone on their behalf, shall accept a cash contribution in excess of one hundred
dollars ($100) in the aggregate from each contributor in any one (1) election. No
candidate, slate of candidates, committee, or contributing organization, nor anyone
on their behalf, shall accept a cashier's check or money order in excess of the
maximum cash contribution limit unless the instrument clearly identifies both the
Page 9 of 14
XXXX 2/5/2026 2:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2092
payor and the payee. A contribution made by cashier's check or money order which
identifies both the payor and payee shall be treated as a contribution made by check
for purposes of the contribution limits contained in this section. No person shall
make a cash contribution in excess of one hundred dollars ($100) in the aggregate
in any one (1) election to a candidate, slate of candidates, committee, or
contributing organization, nor anyone on their behalf.
(5) No candidate, slate of candidates, committee, contributing organization, nor anyone
on their behalf, shall accept any contribution in excess of one hundred dollars
($100) from any person who shall not become eighteen (18) years of age on or
before the day of the next general election.
(6) Except as provided in subsection (22) of this section, no candidate, slate of
candidates, campaign committee, nor anyone acting on their behalf, shall accept a
contribution of more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) as indexed for inflation
every odd-numbered year using the preceding year's percent increase in the non-
seasonally adjusted annual average Consumer Price Index for all Urban Consumers
(CPI-U), U.S. City Average, All Items, for that year as published by the United
States Bureau of Labor Statistics and rounded to the nearest hundred dollars, from
any person, permanent committee, or contributing organization in any one (1)
election. No person, permanent committee, or contributing organization shall
contribute more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) as indexed for inflation every
odd-numbered year using the preceding year's percent increase in the non-
seasonally adjusted annual average Consumer Price Index for all Urban Consumers
(CPI-U), U.S. City Average, All Items, as published by the United States Bureau of
Labor Statistics and rounded to the nearest hundred dollars, to any one (1)
candidate, campaign committee, nor anyone acting on their behalf, in any one (1)
election.
(7) Permanent committees or contributing organizations affiliated by bylaw structure or
Page 10 of 14
XXXX 2/5/2026 2:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2092
by registration, as determined by the Registry of Election Finance, shall be
considered as one (1) committee for purposes of applying the contribution limits of
subsection (6) of this section.
(8) No permanent committee shall contribute funds to another permanent committee for
the purpose of circumventing contribution limits of subsection (6) of this section. A
permanent committee or independent expenditure-only committee may make
unlimited contributions to an independent expenditure-only committee, or as
allowed by federal law to a federally registered political committee, provided that if
a contribution is earmarked for a particular independent expenditure, the person
making the independent expenditure shall disclose the contribution when reporting
the independent expenditure pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.
(9) No person shall contribute funds to a permanent committee, political issues
committee, or contributing organization for the purpose of circumventing the
contribution limits of subsection (6) of this section.
(10) No person shall contribute more than two thousand dollars ($2,000)as indexed for
inflation every odd-numbered year using the preceding year's percent increase in
the non-seasonally adjusted annual average Consumer Price Index for all Urban
Consumers (CPI-U), U.S. City Average, All Items, for that year as published by the
United States Bureau of Labor Statistics and rounded to the nearest hundred dollars,
to a permanent committee or contributing organization in any one (1) year.
(11) (a) No person shall contribute more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) to the
state executive committee of a political party in any one (1) year. The
contribution limit in this paragraph shall not apply to a contribution
designated exclusively for a state executive committee's building fund account
established under KRS 121.172.
(b) No person shall contribute more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) to a
subdivision or affiliate of a state political party in any one (1) year.
Page 11 of 14
XXXX 2/5/2026 2:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2092
(c) No person shall contribute more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) to a
caucus campaign committee in any one (1) year.
(12) No person shall make a payment, distribution, loan, advance, deposit, or gift of
money to another person to contribute to a candidate, a slate of candidates,
committee, contributing organization, or anyone on their behalf. No candidate, slate
of candidates, committee, contributing organization, nor anyone on their behalf
shall accept a contribution made by one (1) person who has received a payment,
distribution, loan, advance, deposit, or gift of money from another person to
contribute to a candidate, a slate of candidates, committee, contributing
organization, or anyone on their behalf.
(13) Subject to the provisions of subsection (17) of this section, no candidate or slate of
candidates for nomination to any state, county, city, or district office, nor their
campaign committees, nor anyone on their behalf, shall solicit or accept
contributions for primary election expenses after the date of the primary. No person
other than the candidate or slate of candidates shall contribute for primary election
expenses after the date of the primary.
(14) Subject to the provisions of subsection (17) of this section, no candidate or slate of
candidates for any state, county, city, or district office at a regular election, nor their
campaign committees, nor anyone on their behalf, shall solicit or accept
contributions for regular election expenses after the date of the regular election. No
person other than the candidate or slate of candidates shall contribute for regular
election expenses after the date of the regular election.
(15) Subject to the provisions of subsection (17) of this section, no candidate or slate of
candidates for nomination or election to any state, county, city, or district office,
nor their campaign committees, nor anyone on their behalf, shall solicit or accept
contributions for special election expenses after the date of the special election. No
person other than the candidate or slate of candidates shall contribute for special
Page 12 of 14
XXXX 2/5/2026 2:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2092
election expenses after the date of the special election.
(16) The provisions of subsections (13) and (14) of this section shall apply only to those
candidates in a primary or regular election which shall be conducted subsequent to
January 1, 1989. The provisions of subsection (15) of this section shall apply only
to those candidates or slates of candidates in a special election which shall be
conducted subsequent to January 1, 1993.
(17) A candidate, slate of candidates, or a campaign committee may solicit and accept
contributions after the date of a primary election, regular election, or special
election to defray necessary expenses that arise after the date of the election
associated with election contests, recounts, and recanvasses of a specific election,
complaints regarding alleged campaign finance violations that are filed with the
registry pertaining to a specific election, or other legal actions pertaining to a
specific election to which a candidate, slate of candidates, or campaign committee
is a party, and for repayment of debts and obligations owed by the campaign or
previous campaign for the same office. Reports of contributions received and
expenditures made after the date of the specific election shall be made in
accordance with KRS 121.180.
(18) No candidate, slate of candidates, committee, except a political issues committee,
independent expenditure-only committee, or contributing organization, nor anyone
on their behalf, shall knowingly accept a contribution from a corporation, directly
or indirectly, except to the extent that the contribution is designated to a state
executive committee's building fund account established under KRS 121.172.
(19) Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict the ability of a corporation to
administer its permanent committee insofar as its actions can be deemed not to
influence an election as prohibited by KRS 121.025.
(20) No candidate, slate of candidates, or committee, nor anyone on their behalf, shall
solicit a contribution of money or services from a state employee, whether or not
Page 13 of 14
XXXX 2/5/2026 2:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2092
the employee is covered by the classified service provisions of KRS Chapter 18A.
However, it shall not be a violation of this subsection for a state employee to
receive a solicitation directed to him as a registered voter in an identified precinct as
part of an overall plan to contact voters not identified as state employees.
(21) No candidate or slate of candidates for any office in this state shall accept a
contribution, including an in-kind contribution, which is made from funds in a
federal campaign account. No person shall make a contribution, including an in-
kind contribution, from funds in a federal campaign account to any candidate or
slate of candidates for any office in this state.
(22) It shall be permissible for a married couple to make a contribution with one (1)
check that reflects the combined individual contribution limits of each individual
spouse per election, as set forth in subsection (6) of this section, for all elections in
a calendar year and the following shall be required to be written on the check:
(a) The signatures of both spouses on the signature line of the check; and
(b) The designation of each contribution amount and the election or elections to
which they apply shall be memorialized on the memo line of the check.
(23) Nothing in this section or in any other provision of this chapter shall be
construed to prohibit a qualified political party committee, including a state or
county executive committee, from endorsing, supporting, opposing, or making
otherwise lawful contributions or expenditures supporting or opposing a
candidacy designated as nonpartisan under state law. The endorsement, support,
or opposition by a political party committee shall not affect the nonpartisan status
of the office or the candidate.
Page 14 of 14
XXXX 2/5/2026 2:30 PM Jacketed